Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.36
Risk assessment, defined.

Risk assessment means an onsite investigation to determine the existence, nature, severity, and location of lead-based paint hazards and the provision of a report by the individual or the firm conducting the risk assessment, explaining the results of the investigation and options for reducing lead-based paint hazards.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 38.